ukrainian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Noun +Masc +Fem +Neut 
    +Sg +Pl 
    +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Ins +Loc +Voc 
    +IDecl ! +IIDecl +IIIDecl +IVDecl
    +Hard +Soft +Mixed +Spec
    @P.SOFT.ON@ @P.PLGEN.ON@

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
! First Declension
! Hard group
думк IDeclHard;
голов IDeclHard;
особ IDeclHard;
! Soft group
вишн IDeclSoft;
змій IDeclSoft;
мрій IDeclSoft;
! Mixed group
круч IDeclMixed;
веж IDeclMixed;
! Special cases
! singular form is declines as the hard group, but
! in plural form -ин- is removed and is declined specifically
люд IDeclSpec; 
дит IDeclSpec;

LEXICON IDeclHard
+N+IDecl+Hard+Nom:^а #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Gen:^и #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Dat:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Acc:^у #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Ins:^ою #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Loc:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Voc:^о #;
IDeclHardPl ;

LEXICON IDeclSoft
+N+IDecl+Soft+Nom:@P.SOFT.ON@^я #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Gen:@P.SOFT.ON@^і #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Dat:@P.SOFT.ON@^і #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Acc:@P.SOFT.ON@^ю #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Ins:@P.SOFT.ON@^ею #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Loc:@P.SOFT.ON@^і #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Voc:@P.SOFT.ON@^е #;
! IDeclSoftPl ;

LEXICON IDeclMixed
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Nom:^а #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Gen:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Dat:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Acc:^у #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Ins:^ею #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Loc:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Voc:^е #;
IDeclMixedPl ;

LEXICON IDeclSpec
+N+IDecl+Spec+Nom:ин^а #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Gen:ин^и #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Dat:ин^і #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Acc:ин^у #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Ins:ин^ою #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Loc:ин^і #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Voc:ин^о #;
IDeclSpecPl ;

LEXICON IDeclHardPl
+N+IDecl+Hard+Nom+Pl:^и #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Gen+Pl:@P.PLGEN.ON@^0 #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Dat+Pl:^ам #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Acc+Pl:^и #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Ins+Pl:^ами #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Loc+Pl:^ах #;
+N+IDecl+Hard+Voc+Pl:^и #;

LEXICON IDeclSoftPl
+N+IDecl+Soft+Nom+Pl:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Gen+Pl:^0 #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Dat+Pl:^ям #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Acc+Pl:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Ins+Pl:^ями #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Loc+Pl:^ях #;
+N+IDecl+Soft+Voc+Pl:^і #;

LEXICON IDeclMixedPl
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Nom+Pl:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Gen+Pl:^0 #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Dat+Pl:^ам #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Acc+Pl:^і #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Ins+Pl:^ами #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Loc+Pl:^ах #;
+N+IDecl+Mixed+Voc+Pl:^і #;

LEXICON IDeclSpecPl
+N+IDecl+Spec+Nom+Pl:^и #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Gen+Pl:^ей #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Dat+Pl:^ям #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Acc+Pl:^ей #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Ins+Pl:ь^ми #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Loc+Pl:^ях #;
+N+IDecl+Spec+Voc+Pl:^и #;
